Florida, session 2026, SB272.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSection 196.075, Florida Statutes, is amended to 18 read: 19 196.075âAdditional Homestead exemption for persons 65 and 20 older.â 21 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 22 (a)ââHouseholdâ means a person or group of persons living 23 together in a room or group of rooms as a housing unit, but the 24 term does not include persons boarding in or renting a portion 25 of the dwelling. 26 (b)ââHousehold incomeâ means the adjusted gross income, as 27 defined in s. 62 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, of 28 all members of a household. 29 (2)âIn accordance with s. 6(d), Art. VII of the State 30 Constitution, the board of county commissioners of any county or 31 the governing authority of any municipality may adopt an 32 ordinance to allow either or both of the following additional 33 homestead exemptions: 34 (a)âUp to $50,000 for a person who has the legal or 35 equitable title to real estate and maintains thereon the 36 permanent residence of the owner, who has attained age 65, and 37 whose household income does not exceed $20,000. 38 (b)âAny The amount of the assessed value of the property 39 for a person who has the legal or equitable title to real estate 40 with a just value less than $250,000, as determined in the first 41 tax year that the owner applies and is eligible for the 42 exemption, and who has maintained thereon the permanent 43 residence of the owner for at least 5 25 years, who has attained 44 age 65, and whose household income does not exceed $350,000 the 45 income limitation prescribed in paragraph (a), as calculated in 46 subsection (3), is entitled to a homestead exemption equal to 47 the assessed value of the property, which shall apply to all ad 48 valorem tax levies other than school district levies. 49 (3)âThe $350,000 $20,000 income limitation shall be 50 adjusted annually, on January 1, by the percentage change in the 51 average cost-of-living index in the period January 1 through 52 December 31 of the immediate prior year compared with the same 53 period for the year prior to that. The index is the average of 54 the monthly consumer-price-index figures for the stated 12-month 55 period, relative to the United States as a whole, issued by the 56 United States Department of Labor. 57 (4)âAn ordinance granting an additional homestead exemption 58 as authorized by this section must meet the following 59 requirements: 60 (a)âIt must be adopted under the procedures for adoption of 61 a nonemergency ordinance specified in chapter 125 by a board of 62 county commissioners or chapter 166 by a municipal governing 63 authority, except that the exemption authorized by paragraph 64 (2)(b) must be authorized by a super majority (a majority plus 65 one) vote of the members of the governing body of the county or 66 municipality granting such exemption. 67 (b)âIt must specify that the exemption applies only to 68 taxes levied by the unit of government granting the exemption. 69 Unless otherwise specified by the county or municipality, this 70 exemption will apply to all tax levies of the county or 71 municipality granting the exemption, including dependent special 72 districts and municipal service taxing units. 73 (c)âIt must specify the amount of the exemption, which may 74 not exceed the applicable amount specified in subsection (2). If 75 the county or municipality specifies a different exemption 76 amount for dependent special districts or municipal service 77 taxing units, the exemption amount must be uniform in all 78 dependent special districts or municipal service taxing units 79 within the county or municipality. 80 (d)âIt must require that a taxpayer claiming the exemption 81 for the first time submit to the property appraiser, not later 82 than March 1, a sworn statement of household income on a form 83 prescribed by the Department of Revenue. 84 (5)âThe department shall must require by rule that the 85 filing of the statement be supported by copies of any federal 86 income tax returns for the prior year, any wage and earnings 87 statements (W-2 forms), any request for an extension of time to 88 file returns, and any other documents it finds necessary, for 89 each member of the household, to be submitted for inspection by 90 the property appraiser. The taxpayerâs sworn statement must 91 shall attest to the accuracy of the documents and grant 92 permission to allow review of the documents if requested by the 93 property appraiser. Once the documents have been inspected by 94 the property appraiser, they must shall be returned to the 95 taxpayer or otherwise destroyed. Annually, the property 96 appraiser shall notify each taxpayer of the adjusted income 97 limitation set forth in subsection (3). The taxpayer must notify 98 the property appraiser by May 1 if his or her household income 99 exceeds the most recent adjusted income limitation. The property 100 appraiser may conduct random audits of the taxpayersâ sworn 101 statements to ensure the accuracy of the household income 102 reported. If selected for audit, a taxpayer must shall execute 103 Internal Revenue Service Form 8821 or 4506, which authorizes the 104 Internal Revenue Service to release tax information to the 105 property appraiserâs office. All reviews conducted in accordance 106 with this section must shall be completed on or before June 1. 107 The property appraiser may not grant the exemption if the 108 required documentation requested is not provided. 109 (6)âThe board of county commissioners or municipal 110 governing authority must deliver a copy of any ordinance adopted 111 under this section to the property appraiser no later than 112 December 1 of the year prior to the year the exemption will take 113 effect. If the ordinance is repealed, the board of county 114 commissioners or municipal governing authority shall notify the 115 property appraiser no later than December 1 of the year prior to 116 the year the exemption expires. 117 (7)âThose persons entitled to the homestead exemption in s. 118 196.031 may apply for and receive an additional homestead 119 exemption as provided in this section. Receipt of the additional 120 homestead exemption provided for in this section shall be 121 subject to the provisions of ss. 196.131 and 196.161, if 122 applicable. 123 (5)(8)âIf title is held jointly with right of survivorship, 124 the person residing on the property and otherwise qualifying may 125 receive the entire amount of the additional homestead exemption. 126 (6)(9)(a)âIf the property appraiser determines that for any 127 year within the immediately previous 10 years a person who was 128 not entitled to the additional homestead exemption under this 129 section was granted such an exemption, the property appraiser 130 must shall serve upon the owner a notice of intent to record in 131 the public records of the county a notice of tax lien against 132 any property owned by that person in the county, and that 133 property must be identified in the notice of tax lien. Any 134 property that is owned by the taxpayer and is situated in this 135 state is subject to the taxes exempted by the improper homestead 136 exemption, plus a penalty of 50 percent of the unpaid taxes for 137 each year and interest at a rate of 15 percent per annum. Before 138 any such lien may be filed, the owner must be given 30 days 139 within which to pay the taxes, penalties, and interest. Such a 140 lien is subject to the procedures and provisions set forth in s. 141 196.161(3). 142 (b)âIf the additional homestead exemption under this 143 section is improperly granted as a result of a clerical mistake 144 or omission by the property appraiser, the person who improperly 145 received the exemption may not be assessed a penalty and 146 interest. Back taxes shall apply only as follows: 147 1.âIf the person who received the additional homestead 148 exemption under this section as a result of a clerical mistake 149 or omission voluntarily discloses to the property appraiser that 150 he or she was not entitled to the homestead exemption before the 151 property appraiser notifies the owner of the mistake or 152 omission, no back taxes shall be due. 153 2.âIf the person who received the additional homestead 154 exemption under this section as a result of a clerical mistake 155 or omission does not voluntarily disclose to the property 156 appraiser that he or she was not entitled to the homestead 157 exemption before the property appraiser notifies the owner of 158 the mistake or omission, back taxes shall be due for any year or 159 years that the owner was not entitled to the limitation within 160 the 5 years before the property appraiser notified the owner of 161 the mistake or omission. 162 3.âThe property appraiser shall serve upon an owner that 163 owes back taxes under subparagraph 2. a notice of intent to 164 record in the public records of the county a notice of tax lien 165 against any property owned by that person in the county, and 166 such property must be identified in the notice of tax lien. The 167 property appraiser must include with such notice information 168 explaining why the owner is not entitled to the limitation, the 169 years for which unpaid taxes are due, and the manner in which 170 unpaid taxes have been calculated. Before any such lien may be 171 filed, the owner must be given 30 days within which to pay the 172 taxes, penalties, and interest. Such a lien is subject to the 173 procedures and provisions set forth in s. 196.161(3). 174 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 196.082, Florida 175 Statutes, is amended to read: 176 196.082âDiscounts for disabled veterans; surviving spouse 177 carryover.â 178 (1)âEach veteran who is age 65 or older, and is partially 179 or totally permanently disabled, and does not qualify for the 180 exemption under s. 196.075 shall receive a discount from the 181 amount of the ad valorem tax otherwise owed on homestead 182 property that the veteran owns and resides in if: 183 (a)âThe disability was combat-related; and 184 (b)âThe veteran was honorably discharged upon separation 185 from military service. 186 Section 3.â(1)âThe Department of Revenue is authorized, 187 and all conditions are deemed met, to adopt emergency rules 188 pursuant to s. 120.54(4), Florida Statutes, to administer this 189 act. 190 (2)âNotwithstanding any other law, emergency rules adopted 191 pursuant to this section are effective for 6 months after 192 adoption and may be renewed during the pendency of procedures to 193 adopt permanent rules addressing the subject of the emergency 194 rules. 195 Section 4.âThe amendments made by this act to ss. 196.075 196 and 196.082, Florida Statutes, first apply to the 2027 tax roll. 197 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect on the effective date 198 of the amendment to the State Constitution proposed by SJR 270 199 or a similar joint resolution having substantially the same 200 specific intent and purpose, if such amendment to the State 201 Constitution is approved at the next general election or at an 202 earlier special election specifically authorized by law for that 203 purpose.